Washington statutes.
RCW 15.28.150

Committee organization—Duties.

Each district advisory committee and each state commodity committee shall select one of its members as chair. Meetings may be called by the chair or by any two members of any committee by giving reasonable written notice of the meeting to each member of such committee. A majority of the members shall be necessary to constitute a quorum. The district advisory committees and state commodity committees shall consult with and advise the commission on matters pertaining to the soft tree fruits which they respectively represent, and the commission shall give due consideration to their recommendations. Any grower, dealer, or processor, if qualified, may be a member of more than one committee.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6039; 1961 c 11 s 15.28.150. Prior: 1947 c 73 s 12; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2909-21.]